Wyoming, session 2026, SF0052.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Board" means the Wyoming wildlife and
natural resource trust account board created by W.S.
9-15-104;
(ii) "Income account" means the Wyoming wildlife
and natural resource trust income account created by W.S.
9-15-103(b).
(b) Pursuant to the authority granted under W.S.
9-15-104(k) and subject to each recipient's certification
under W.S. 9-15-103(r), authorization is granted for
funding of the large projects provided for in subsections
(c) through (h) of this section.
(c) Upper Greybull Fish Passage III:
(i) Project sponsor: Wyoming game and fish
commission;
(ii) Project purpose: Restoration of native
fisheries, riparian and aquatic ecosystems through
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
vegetation management, riparian restoration and removal of
barriers to fish movement on approximately forty-eight (48)
miles of streams in northeast Wyoming in order to:
(A) Maintain migration and movement for
native fish species;
(B) Maintain river function;
(C) Reduce or eliminate excessive erosion;
(D) Stabilize irrigation delivery systems.
(iii) Project description: River restoration;
(iv) Total project budget: Three million three
hundred seventy-three thousand nine hundred eleven dollars
($3,373,911.00);
(v) Project grant: The total grant for the
project, including all grants previously awarded for the
project and the additional one hundred fifty thousand
dollar ($150,000.00) grant authorized under this
subsection, shall be one million three hundred thousand
dollars ($1,300,000.00);
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board one hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($150,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to
carry out the purposes of this subsection.
(d) Baggs Valley Headwaters V:
(i) Project sponsor: Little Snake River
conservation district;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) Project purpose: Restoration of native
vegetation through mechanical, chemical and prescribed fire
across a varied landscape of approximately five thousand
five hundred (5,500) acres in Carbon county in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, moose, antelope and other species;
(B) Maintain primary migration corridors
for native ungulates;
(C) Maintain core population areas for
greater sage grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(D) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes.
(iii) Project description: Rangeland
restoration;
(iv) Total project budget: Five million two
hundred six thousand five hundred dollars ($5,206,500.00);
(v) Project grant: The total grant for the
project, including all grants previously awarded for the
project and the additional seven hundred thousand dollar
($700,000.00) grant authorized under this subsection, shall
be two million one hundred forty-eight thousand dollars
($2,148,000.00);
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board seven hundred thousand
dollars ($700,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to
carry out the purposes of this subsection.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(e) Absaroka Front Cheatgrass:
(i) Project sponsor: Park county weed and pest
district;
(ii) Project purpose: Removal of invasive
grasses on approximately forty-eight thousand (48,000)
acres in Park county in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, moose, antelope and bighorn sheep;
(B) Maintain core population areas for
greater sage grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(C) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes;
(D) Maintain agricultural production and
opportunity on high-quality ranch lands.
(iii) Project description: Invasive species
management;
(iv) Total project budget: Three million five
hundred thirty-four thousand eight hundred ninety dollars
($3,534,890.00);
(v) Project grant: The total grant for the
project, including all grants previously awarded for the
project and the additional three hundred ninety-five
thousand dollar ($395,000.00) grant authorized under this
subsection, shall be six hundred eighty-five thousand
dollars ($685,000.00);
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board three hundred ninety-five
thousand dollars ($395,000.00) or as much thereof as is
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
(f) Cody Canal Fish Screen:
(i) Project sponsor: Wyoming game and fish
commission;
(ii) Project purpose: Removal of fish species
from entrainment in irrigation systems by screening and by
returning to the main headgate infrastructure in Park
county in order to:
(A) Maintain fish populations on a river
system with extraordinarily high losses of fish;
(B) Maintain recreational opportunity on a
river with high values for fishing;
(C) Conserve species considered vulnerable
to loss.
(iii) Project description: River restoration;
(iv) Total project budget: Four million four
hundred twenty-nine thousand three hundred sixty-seven
dollars ($4,429,367.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant to the sponsor eight hundred thousand dollars
($800,000.00) for the purposes specified in this
subsection;
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board eight hundred thousand
dollars ($800,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to
carry out the purposes of this subsection.
(g) North Platte Cheatgrass:
(i) Project sponsor: Natrona county weed and
pest district;
(ii) Project purpose: Removal of invasive
grasses on approximately nine thousand (9,000) acres in
Natrona county in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk and antelope;
(B) Reduce or eliminate the potential for
catastrophic fire;
(C) Allow regeneration of cottonwood
gallery forests.
(iii) Project description: Invasive species
management;
(iv) Total project budget: Two million nine
hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($2,916,000.00);
(v) Project grant: The board is authorized to
grant one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) to the sponsor
for the purposes specified in this subsection;
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board one million dollars
($1,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purposes of this subsection.
(h) Western Wyoming Cheatgrass:
(i) Project sponsor: Teton county weed and pest
district;
(ii) Project purpose: Removal of invasive
grasses on approximately forty-eight thousand five hundred
(48,500) acres in western Wyoming in order to:
(A) Maintain key seasonal habitats for mule
deer, elk, moose, antelope and bighorn sheep;
(B) Maintain core population areas for
greater sage grouse and other sagebrush obligate species;
(C) Conserve valuable grassland and
intermediate shrubland ecotypes;
(D) Maintain agricultural production and
opportunity on high-quality ranch lands.
(iii) Project description: Invasive species
management;
(iv) Total project budget: Six million nine
hundred sixty-three thousand eight hundred three dollars
($6,963,803.00);
(v) Project grant: The total grant for the
project, including all grants previously awarded for the
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
project and the additional two million dollar
($2,000,000.00) grant authorized under this subsection,
shall be three million four hundred thousand dollars
($3,400,000.00);
(vi) Appropriation: There is appropriated from
the income account to the board two million dollars
($2,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary to carry
out the purposes of this subsection.
(j) Any unexpended and unobligated funds remaining
from appropriations under this section shall revert to the
income account on June 30, 2030.
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
9